Massachusetts, session 194th, H1866.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 53 of chapter 208 of the General Laws, as appearing the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out subsection b and inserting in place thereof the following :-
(b) (i) Except for reimbursement alimony or circumstances warranting deviation for other
forms of alimony, the amount of alimony should generally not exceed the recipient's need or 30
to 35 per cent of the difference between the parties’ gross incomes, if federally tax deductible, or,
if not federally tax deductible as of January 1, 2019, the recipient’s need or 23 per cent to 28 per
cent of the difference between the parties’ gross incomes, as established at the time of the order
being issued. Subject to subsection (c), income shall be defined as set forth in the Massachusetts
child support guidelines.
of 2

(b) (ii) The provisions of this Act shall only apply to alimony orders entered on or after
January 1, 2019 or to any existing alimony agreement entered into prior to the 2019 that is
modified on or after January 1, 2019.
of 2